not-to-release/fst/nci.lexc
LEXICON V-DV-TIA

%<v%>%<dv%>:tia                                                    V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<dv%>:tia                                                    V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<dv%>:tia                                                    V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<dv%>:ti                                                     V-PAST ; 

LEXICON V-DV-A 

%<v%>%<dv%>:a                                                      V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<dv%>:a                                                      V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<dv%>:a                                                      V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<dv%>:                                                       V-PAST ; 

LEXICON V-TV-OA 

%<v%>%<tv%>:oa                                                     V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:oa                                                     V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:oa                                                     V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:o                                                      V-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:o                                                      V-DERIV ; 

LEXICON V-TV-YA 

%<v%>%<tv%>:ya                                                      V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:ya                                                      V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:ya                                                      V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:x                                                       V-PAST ; 


LEXICON V-TV-A 

%<v%>%<tv%>%<past%>:a%>c                                           V-AGR-NBR-SG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>:a                                                      V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:a                                                      V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:a                                                      V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:                                                       V-PAST ; 

LEXICON V-TV-HUI

%<v%>%<tv%>:hui                                                   V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:hui                                                   V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:hui                                                   V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:uh                                                    V-PAST ; 

LEXICON V-TV-HUIA

%<v%>%<tv%>:huia                                                   V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:huia                                                   V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:huia                                                   V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:hui                                                    V-PAST ; 

LEXICON V-TV-HUA 

%<v%>%<tv%>:hua                                                    V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:hua                                                    V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:hua                                                    V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:uh                                                    V-PAST ; 

LEXICON V-TV-LIA

%<v%>%<tv%>:lia                                                    V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:lia                                                    V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:lia                                                    V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:li                                                     V-PAST ; 

LEXICON V-TV-TIA

%<v%>%<tv%>:tia                                                    V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:tia                                                    V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:tia                                                    V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:ti                                                     V-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:ti                                                     V-DERIV ; 

LEXICON V-TV-I

%<v%>%<tv%>:i                                                      V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:i                                                      V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:i                                                      V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:i                                                      V-PAST ; 

LEXICON V-IV-HUA

%<v%>%<iv%>:hua                                                      V-AUX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:hua                                                      V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:hua                                                      V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:hua                                                      V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:uh                                                       V-PAST ; 


LEXICON V-IV-A

%<v%>%<iv%>:a                                                      V-AUX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:a                                                      V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:a                                                      V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:a                                                      V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:                                                       V-PAST ; 

LEXICON V-IV-I

%<v%>%<iv%>:i                                                      V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:i                                                      V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:i                                                      V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:                                                       V-PAST ; 

LEXICON V-IV-OA 

%<v%>%<iv%>:oa                                                     V-IMPERF ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:oa                                                     V-PRES ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:o                                                      V-FUT ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:o                                                      V-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>:oti                                                     V-DERIV ; 



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N-DERIV 

%<rev%>:%>tzin # ;
%<rev%>%<pl%>:%>tzi~tzin # ;
%<dim%>:%>ton # ;
%<aug%>:%>pol # ;

LEXICON N-DERIV-PL

%<rev%>:%>tzi~tzin # ;

LEXICON N-POSESION

%<pl%>:%>huan                           # ;
%<pl%>:%>huan                           N-DERIV-PL ;
                                        # ;

LEXICON N-LI

@D.Poss@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Poss@%>li       # ;
@D.Poss@%<n%>%<pl%>:@D.Poss@%>tin       # ;
@R.Poss.1@%<n%>:@R.Poss.1@              N-POSESION ;
%<n%>:                                  N-DERIV ;

LEXICON N-TL 

@D.Poss@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Poss@%>tl       # ;
@D.Poss@%<n%>%<pl%>:@D.Poss@%>me        # ;
@R.Poss.1@%<n%>:@R.Poss.1@              N-POSESION ;
%<n%>:                                  N-DERIV ;

LEXICON N-TLI

@D.Poss@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Poss@%>tli      # ;
@D.Poss@%<n%>%<pl%>:@D.Poss@%>tin       # ;
@R.Poss.1@%<n%>:@R.Poss.1@              N-POSESION ;
%<n%>:                                  N-DERIV ;

LEXICON N-POSS

@R.Poss.1@%<n%>:@R.Poss.1@              N-POSESION ;

LEXICON N-HUITL 

@D.Poss@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Poss@%>tl       # ;
@R.Poss.1@%<n%>:@R.Poss.1@              N-POSESION ;
%<n%>:                                  N-DERIV ;

LEXICON N-Ø

@D.Poss@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Poss@           # ;
@D.Poss@%<n%>%<pl%>:@D.Poss@%>me        # ;
@R.Poss.1@%<n%>:@R.Poss.1@              N-POSESION ;
%<n%>:                                  N-DERIV ;

LEXICON N-NI

@D.Poss@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Poss@%>ni       # ;
@R.Poss.1@%<n%>:@R.Poss.1@              N-POSESION ;
%<n%>:                                  N-DERIV ;


LEXICON N-ECA

@D.Poss@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Poss@           # ;
@R.Poss.1@%<n%>:@R.Poss.1@              N-POSESION ;
%<n%>:                                  N-DERIV ;

LEXICON N-TETEUH

@D.Poss@%<n%>%<pl%>:@D.Poss@%>uh        # ;

LEXICON N-CICITLALTIN

@D.Poss@%<n%>%<pl%>:@D.Poss@%>tin        # ;


LEXICON N-SPA-ANES

%<n%>:án                                   # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:an%>es                          # ;


LEXICON N-SPA-ES

%<n%>:                                   # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>es                          # ;

LEXICON N-SPA-S

%<n%>:                                   # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>s                          # ;


LEXICON N-SPA

%<n%>:                                   # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N-LOC

@R.Poss.1@%<n%>%<loc%>:@R.Poss.1@              N-POSESION ;
@D.Poss@%<n%>%<loc%>:@D.Poss@              N-POSESION ; ! in ompa teopan

LEXICON Comunes 
teotl:tete                                      N-TETEUH ; ! ""
pilli:pi~pil                                   N-CICITLALTIN ; ! ""
amoxtli:amox                                    N-TLI   ; ! "libro"
cactli:cac                                      N-TLI   ; ! "zapato"
chantli:chan                                    N-TLI   ; ! "hogar"
tezahuitl:tezahui                               N-HUITL ; ! ""
ilhuitl:ilhui                                   N-HUITL ; ! ""
telpochtli:telpoch                              N-TLI   ; ! ""
toca:toca                                       N-POSS ; ! ""
amamachiyotl:amamachiyo                          N-TL ; ! ""
chichipelotl:chichipelo                          N-TL ; ! ""
centlaniyotl:centlaniyo                          N-TL ; ! ""
cuammoyotl:cuammoyo                              N-TL ; ! ""
cuitlapetotl:cuitlapeto                          N-TL ; ! ""
ichcaxochitl:ichcaxochi                          N-TL ; ! ""
monamiccayotl:monamiccayo                        N-TL ; ! ""
quechcoliuhcayotl:quechcoliuhcayo                N-TL ; ! ""
tlapouhcayotl:tlapouhcayo                        N-TL ; ! ""
tepozmecayotl:tepozmecayo                        N-TL ; ! ""
xochiyaoyotl:xochiyaoyo                          N-TL ; ! ""
yaotetzahuitl:yaotetzahui                       N-HUITL ; ! ""
miquiztetzahuitl:miquiztetzahui                 N-HUITL ; ! ""
xihuitl:xihui                                   N-HUITL ; ! ""
yaohuitl:yaohui                                 N-HUITL ; ! ""
cuauhuitl:cuauhui                               N-HUITL ; ! ""
cuahuitl:cuahui                                 N-HUITL ; ! ""
ihhuitl:ihhui                                   N-HUITL ; ! ""
ilhuitl:ilhui                                   N-HUITL ; ! ""
ixpilhuitl:ixpilhui                             N-HUITL ; ! ""
pochteca:pochteca                               N-ECA ; ! ""
tlaxcalteca:tlaxcalteca                         N-ECA ; ! ""
chichimeca:chichimeca                           N-ECA ; ! ""
citlalli:ci~citlal				N-CICITLALTIN ; ! ""
chilatolli:chilatol                             N-LI ; ! ""
cuauhixhualli:cuauhixhual                       N-LI ; ! ""
iyamolli:iyamol                                 N-LI ; ! ""
nextlatilli:nextlatil                           N-LI ; ! ""
tlacenchicahualli:tlacenchicahual               N-LI ; ! ""
tlaihcihuitilli:tlaihcihuitil                   N-LI ; ! ""
tlanetechpacholli:tlanetechpachol               N-LI ; ! ""
tlatepitztlalilli:tlatepitztlalil               N-LI ; ! ""
tlaxiuhcahualli:tlaxiuhcahual                   N-LI ; ! ""
tepepolli:tepepol                               N-LI ; ! ""
xitomamolli:xitomamol                           N-LI ; ! ""
cuauhtli:cuauhtli                               N-TLI ; ! ""
cuauhtli:cua~cuauh                              N-CICITLALTIN ; ! ""
miquiztli:miquiz                                N-TLI ; ! ""
huitztli:huitz                                  N-TLI ; ! ""
nacaztli:nacaz                                  N-TLI ; ! ""
yohualtepoztli:yohualtepoz                      N-TLI ; ! ""
octli:oc                                        N-TLI ; ! ""
cuetli:cue                                      N-TLI ; ! "falda"
tecuani:tecua                                   N-NI ; ! "bestia"
tlatoani:tlatoa                                 N-NI ; ! ""
yaotlatoani:yaotlatoa                           N-NI ; ! ""
diablo:diablo                                   N-Ø     ; ! "diablo"
padre:padre                                     N-Ø     ; ! ""
capítulo:capítulo                               N-Ø     ; ! ""
don:don                                         N-SPA ; ! ""
gobernador:gobernador                           N-SPA-ES ; ! ""
capitán:capit                                   N-SPA-ANES ; ! ""
español:español                                 N-SPA-ES ; ! ""
audiencia:audiencia                             N-SPA-S     ; ! ""
mayordomo:mayordomo                             N-SPA-S     ; ! ""
párrafo:párrafo                                 N-SPA-S ; ! ""
